South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4663.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 22-1-10(B)(2) of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (c) On and after July 1, 2026, no person is eligible for an initial appointment to hold the office of magistrate who is not at the time of his appointment: (i) a citizen of the United States and of this State, (ii) has not been a resident of this State for at least five years, (iii) has not attained the age of twenty-one years upon his appointment, and (iv) is not a licensed attorney in South Carolina. However, a county with a population of less than seventy-five thousand is exempt from the provisions of subsubitem (iv) and the magistrate must have received a four-year baccalaureate degree. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----